lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4946 Y 1
SFX 4946 0 ීමටවත් .
SFX 3259 Y 1
SFX 3259 0 ාලයෙන් .
SFX 2658 Y 1
SFX 2658 0 න්නන්ට .
SFX 1942 Y 1
SFX 1942 0 ෂ්‍ය .
SFX 2524 Y 1
SFX 2524 0 වන්ගෙ .
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 0 වන්ගේ .
SFX 3196 Y 1
SFX 3196 0 ිකයින්ට .
SFX 994 Y 1
SFX 994 0 කරුවෙක් .
SFX 996 Y 1
SFX 996 0 කරුවෙකි .
SFX 995 Y 1
SFX 995 0 කරුවෙකු .
SFX 2969 Y 1
SFX 2969 0 ොල් .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 0 ෙන්නට .
SFX 1570 Y 1
SFX 1570 0 ාකර .
SFX 5000 Y 1
SFX 5000 0 ිසල් .
SFX 4565 Y 1
SFX 4565 0 ්කරුගේ .
SFX 420 Y 1
SFX 420 0 ාක් .
SFX 4696 Y 1
SFX 4696 0 ෙන්නා .
SFX 2644 Y 1
SFX 2644 0 පනය .
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 0 ෙන්නෙ .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 ෙන්නේ .
SFX 2238 Y 1
SFX 2238 0 ෙන්නෝ .
SFX 871 Y 1
SFX 871 0 ලෙන් .
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 0 පන් .
SFX 3508 Y 1
SFX 3508 0 වාදිය .
SFX 3200 Y 1
SFX 3200 0 ිකත්වයෙන් .
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 0 ්වලට .
SFX 1077 Y 1
SFX 1077 0 යිනට .
SFX 2860 Y 1
SFX 2860 0 ්වලද .
SFX 2420 Y 1
SFX 2420 0 සෙන .
SFX 4259 Y 1
SFX 4259 0 ්වලය .
SFX 1025 Y 1
SFX 1025 0 ියගේ .
SFX 2750 Y 1
SFX 2750 0 ණෙමි .
SFX 1194 Y 1
SFX 1194 0 වානම් .
SFX 1571 Y 1
SFX 1571 0 ාංශයේ .
SFX 612 Y 1
SFX 612 0 කරමින් .
SFX 4258 Y 1
SFX 4258 0 ්වලා .
SFX 92 Y 1
SFX 92 0 යින් .
SFX 2832 Y 1
SFX 2832 0 කරමිනි .
SFX 2587 Y 1
SFX 2587 0 යිනි .
SFX 2950 Y 1
SFX 2950 0 ්කිරීමට .
SFX 2586 Y 1
SFX 2586 0 යිනේ .
SFX 4616 Y 1
SFX 4616 0 ොන්නරුවට .
SFX 1408 Y 1
SFX 1408 0 පයෙන් .
SFX 4699 Y 1
SFX 4699 0 ෙන්නටත් .
SFX 2088 Y 1
SFX 2088 0 නේනම් .
SFX 1937 Y 1
SFX 1937 0 සින් .
SFX 3401 Y 1
SFX 3401 0 සිනි .
SFX 1673 Y 1
SFX 1673 0 න්නත් .
SFX 1967 Y 1
SFX 1967 0 වහන්සේගේ .
SFX 4615 Y 1
SFX 4615 0 ොන්නරුවේ .
SFX 4812 Y 1
SFX 4812 0 ුරෙකු .
SFX 1708 Y 1
SFX 1708 0 තාවන්ට .
SFX 3830 Y 1
SFX 3830 0 පාක්ෂික .
SFX 3747 Y 1
SFX 3747 0 මුසු .
SFX 1043 Y 1
SFX 1043 0 ස්ථානය .
SFX 590 Y 1
SFX 590 0 ාටත් .
SFX 3989 Y 1
SFX 3989 0 තීන් .
SFX 3658 Y 1
SFX 3658 0 රයෙක් .
SFX 3659 Y 1
SFX 3659 0 රයෙකු .
SFX 4280 Y 1
SFX 4280 0 ්ලෙහි .
SFX 4548 Y 1
SFX 4548 0 ්ගම් .
SFX 1396 Y 1
SFX 1396 0 යාටත් .
SFX 1269 Y 1
SFX 1269 0 කොටුව .
SFX 3490 Y 1
SFX 3490 0 වැටීම .
SFX 3834 Y 1
SFX 3834 0 පසට .
SFX 4436 Y 1
SFX 4436 0 ්නටද .
SFX 4434 Y 1
SFX 4434 0 ්නටම .
SFX 1887 Y 1
SFX 1887 0 ාලෝක .
SFX 2284 Y 1
SFX 2284 0 ුණක් .
SFX 3083 Y 1
SFX 3083 0 ුණකි .
SFX 1667 Y 1
SFX 1667 0 පස් .
SFX 3328 Y 1
SFX 3328 0 ාංකය .
SFX 755 Y 1
SFX 755 0 ්වලදී .
SFX 3204 Y 1
SFX 3204 0 ෑවේ .
SFX 3811 Y 1
SFX 3811 0 බඩු .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 වුන් .
SFX 3459 Y 1
SFX 3459 0 වුනු .
SFX 842 Y 1
SFX 842 0 ිනුත් .
SFX 2469 Y 1
SFX 2469 0 වුනේ .
SFX 1904 Y 1
SFX 1904 0 ාගාරයෙන් .
SFX 3113 Y 1
SFX 3113 0 ිල්ලක් .
SFX 3059 Y 1
SFX 3059 0 ුම්වලදී .
SFX 2136 Y 1
SFX 2136 0 ණක් .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 0 ්‍යයෙහි .
SFX 4029 Y 1
SFX 4029 0 ණකි .
SFX 3612 Y 1
SFX 3612 0 ලස්සේ .
SFX 2773 Y 1
SFX 2773 0 චාරයෙන් .
SFX 3444 Y 1
SFX 3444 0 වේදියෙකු .
SFX 3197 Y 1
SFX 3197 0 ිකයාත් .
SFX 2924 Y 1
SFX 2924 0 ්තෙන් .
SFX 2023 Y 1
SFX 2023 0 යෙහිලා .
SFX 4543 Y 1
SFX 4543 0 ්ගල් .
SFX 1142 Y 1
SFX 1142 0 ේවා .
SFX 1141 Y 1
SFX 1141 0 ේවි .
SFX 4024 Y 1
SFX 4024 0 ණයන්ගෙන් .
SFX 3633 Y 1
SFX 3633 0 රුවට .
SFX 1091 Y 1
SFX 1091 0 නෙත් .
SFX 3397 Y 1
SFX 3397 0 සිවලට .
SFX 1195 Y 1
SFX 1195 0 වාගේ .
SFX 2561 Y 1
SFX 2561 0 රුවා .
SFX 1132 Y 1
SFX 1132 0 ්නෙකුට .
SFX 1429 Y 1
SFX 1429 0 තයෙන් .
SFX 2632 Y 1
SFX 2632 0 පොළක් .
SFX 3559 Y 1
SFX 3559 0 වදී .
SFX 1714 Y 1
SFX 1714 0 ණයන් .
SFX 4895 Y 1
SFX 4895 0 ුණටත් .
SFX 3835 Y 1
SFX 3835 0 පර් .
SFX 3878 Y 1
SFX 3878 0 නොවී .
SFX 3493 Y 1
SFX 3493 0 වාසීන්ගේ .
SFX 1363 Y 1
SFX 1363 0 ාගේත් .
SFX 2849 Y 1
SFX 2849 0 ්වෙමින් .
SFX 3964 Y 1
SFX 3964 0 දට .
SFX 1695 Y 1
SFX 1695 0 දන .
SFX 3960 Y 1
SFX 3960 0 දම .
SFX 2725 Y 1
SFX 2725 0 දය .
SFX 2115 Y 1
SFX 2115 0 දර .
SFX 3954 Y 1
SFX 3954 0 දල .
SFX 688 Y 1
SFX 688 0 ගත්තා .
SFX 2173 Y 1
SFX 2173 0 ්වුණ .
SFX 4826 Y 1
SFX 4826 0 ුම්හි .
SFX 4087 Y 1
SFX 4087 0 ගත්තෙ .
SFX 535 Y 1
SFX 535 0 ගත්තේ .
SFX 4086 Y 1
SFX 4086 0 ගත්තෝ .
SFX 2705 Y 1
SFX 2705 0 ද් .
SFX 276 Y 1
SFX 276 0 දා .
SFX 888 Y 1
SFX 888 0 දැ .
SFX 3943 Y 1
SFX 3943 0 දෑ .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 0 දි .
SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25 0 දී .
SFX 399 Y 1
SFX 399 0 දු .
SFX 683 Y 1
SFX 683 0 දේ .
SFX 4110 Y 1
SFX 4110 0 කීමට .
SFX 886 Y 1
SFX 886 0 දෝ .
SFX 4223 Y 1
SFX 4223 0 ්වුව .
SFX 4221 Y 1
SFX 4221 0 ්වුහ .
SFX 2507 Y 1
SFX 2507 0 වයත් .
SFX 4080 Y 1
SFX 4080 0 ගමගේ .
SFX 4300 Y 1
SFX 4300 0 ්ලකින් .
SFX 1893 Y 1
SFX 1893 0 ාරක්ෂාව .
SFX 4989 Y 1
SFX 4989 0 ිහාමි .
SFX 377 Y 1
SFX 377 0 සිරි .
SFX 2426 Y 1
SFX 2426 0 සියයකට .
SFX 4392 Y 1
SFX 4392 0 ්බීම .
SFX 2092 Y 1
SFX 2092 0 නියන් .
SFX 3399 Y 1
SFX 3399 0 සියයක් .
SFX 2895 Y 1
SFX 2895 0 ්පයක් .
SFX 2843 Y 1
SFX 2843 0 “ .
SFX 1465 Y 1
SFX 1465 0 ” .
SFX 3594 Y 1
SFX 3594 0 ලිවල .
SFX 1139 Y 1
SFX 1139 0 ්කොට .
SFX 4553 Y 1
SFX 4553 0 ්කොල .
SFX 4636 Y 1
SFX 4636 0 ේමය .
SFX 1275 Y 1
SFX 1275 0 කයින්ට .
SFX 3289 Y 1
SFX 3289 0 ාන්තයන්හි .
SFX 2947 Y 1
SFX 2947 0 ්කොළ .
SFX 3833 Y 1
SFX 3833 0 පහක් .
SFX 4899 Y 1
SFX 4899 0 ුට්ටෝ .
SFX 738 Y 1
SFX 738 0 න්ගෙ .
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 0 න්ගේ .
SFX 3636 Y 1
SFX 3636 0 රුම් .
SFX 2400 Y 1
SFX 2400 0 ාංශයටත් .
SFX 4769 Y 1
SFX 4769 0 ුවෙන්ම .
SFX 4465 Y 1
SFX 4465 0 ්දහසකට .
SFX 2513 Y 1
SFX 2513 0 වපු .
SFX 1652 Y 1
SFX 1652 0 යන්ගෙ .
SFX 97 Y 1
SFX 97 0 යන්ගේ .
SFX 1880 Y 1
SFX 1880 0 ාවේදී .
SFX 2481 Y 1
SFX 2481 0 වැසියන් .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 ්නන් .
SFX 4238 Y 1
SFX 4238 0 ්වැන්න .
SFX 2066 Y 1
SFX 2066 0 බවට .
SFX 2584 Y 1
SFX 2584 0 යෙකුගෙන් .
SFX 4135 Y 1
SFX 4135 0 කාන්ති .
SFX 640 Y 1
SFX 640 0 පත .
SFX 2079 Y 1
SFX 2079 0 පන .
SFX 969 Y 1
SFX 969 0 පය .
SFX 1407 Y 1
SFX 1407 0 පර .
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 0 පල .
SFX 1918 Y 1
SFX 1918 0 හක් .
SFX 1124 Y 1
SFX 1124 0 ්වෙන .
SFX 2449 Y 1
SFX 2449 0 ශය .
SFX 1235 Y 1
SFX 1235 0 පස .
SFX 1406 Y 1
SFX 1406 0 පළ .
SFX 1658 Y 1
SFX 1658 0 ප් .
SFX 1405 Y 1
SFX 1405 0 පා .
SFX 847 Y 1
SFX 847 0 ානම් .
SFX 1664 Y 1
SFX 1664 0 පි .
SFX 2634 Y 1
SFX 2634 0 පී .
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 0 පු .
SFX 1660 Y 1
SFX 1660 0 පේ .
SFX 1716 Y 1
SFX 1716 0 ඩන් .
SFX 4740 Y 1
SFX 4740 0 ෙකැයි .
SFX 3713 Y 1
SFX 3713 0 යයට .
SFX 1697 Y 1
SFX 1697 0 ත්වයක .
SFX 205 Y 1
SFX 205 0 ත්වයට .
SFX 1696 Y 1
SFX 1696 0 ත්වයද .
SFX 596 Y 1
SFX 596 0 වරිය .
SFX 60 Y 1
SFX 60 0 යයි .
SFX 4520 Y 1
SFX 4520 0 ්ඩින් .
SFX 1081 Y 1
SFX 1081 0 යයේ .
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338 0 ත්වයේ .
SFX 2859 Y 1
SFX 2859 0 ්වාදිය .
SFX 3649 Y 1
SFX 3649 0 රැස් .
SFX 1961 Y 1
SFX 1961 0 වාසීන්ට .
SFX 2231 Y 1
SFX 2231 0 ේලා .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 යේත් .
SFX 2669 Y 1
SFX 2669 0 නෙහි .
SFX 851 Y 1
SFX 851 0 ාගත් .
SFX 1271 Y 1
SFX 1271 0 කාරියක .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 පිට .
SFX 1453 Y 1
SFX 1453 0 කාරක .
SFX 2637 Y 1
SFX 2637 0 පිත .
SFX 1663 Y 1
SFX 1663 0 පිය .
SFX 2635 Y 1
SFX 2635 0 පිල .
SFX 3141 Y 1
SFX 3141 0 ිමල් .
SFX 1452 Y 1
SFX 1452 0 කාරය .
SFX 4510 Y 1
SFX 4510 0 ්තමින් .
SFX 4139 Y 1
SFX 4139 0 කවීම .
SFX 414 Y 1
SFX 414 0 කාරි .
SFX 252 Y 1
SFX 252 0 කාරී .
SFX 2662 Y 1
SFX 2662 0 න්තයි .
SFX 2661 Y 1
SFX 2661 0 න්තයේ .
SFX 2022 Y 1
SFX 2022 0 යේදීත් .
SFX 3247 Y 1
SFX 3247 0 ාශයක් .
SFX 2508 Y 1
SFX 2508 0 වයකින් .
SFX 4802 Y 1
SFX 4802 0 ුලිය .
SFX 1565 Y 1
SFX 1565 0 ාන්ත .
SFX 2040 Y 1
SFX 2040 0 ඹේ .
SFX 2401 Y 1
SFX 2401 0 ෆ් .
SFX 921 Y 1
SFX 921 0 ීන්ගේ .
SFX 2296 Y 1
SFX 2296 0 ිවීමයි .
SFX 3691 Y 1
SFX 3691 0 යුම් .
SFX 2423 Y 1
SFX 2423 0 සුමට .
SFX 3296 Y 1
SFX 3296 0 ාධිපතිවරුන් .
SFX 1277 Y 1
SFX 1277 0 කයන්ගෙන් .
SFX 1181 Y 1
SFX 1181 0 සුම් .
SFX 3388 Y 1
SFX 3388 0 සුමේ .
SFX 3634 Y 1
SFX 3634 0 රුවක් .
SFX 3635 Y 1
SFX 3635 0 රුවකු .
SFX 2421 Y 1
SFX 2421 0 සුළු .
SFX 2544 Y 1
SFX 2544 0 ලිලා .
SFX 3002 Y 1
SFX 3002 0 ෙන්නක් .
SFX 830 Y 1
SFX 830 0 ෙදි .
SFX 1145 Y 1
SFX 1145 0 ෙදී .
SFX 1799 Y 1
SFX 1799 0 ෙන්නකි .
SFX 1772 Y 1
SFX 1772 0 ්ගෙන .
SFX 520 Y 1
SFX 520 0 ාවක .
SFX 443 Y 1
SFX 443 0 ාවට .
SFX 1885 Y 1
SFX 1885 0 ාවද .
SFX 1357 Y 1
SFX 1357 0 ාවන .
SFX 2368 Y 1
SFX 2368 0 ාවම .
SFX 4286 Y 1
SFX 4286 0 ්ලස්සේ .
SFX 2367 Y 1
SFX 2367 0 ාවය .
SFX 1355 Y 1
SFX 1355 0 ාවල .
SFX 3210 Y 1
SFX 3210 0 ැස්මට .
SFX 4014 Y 1
SFX 4014 0 ණුවලින් .
SFX 3842 Y 1
SFX 3842 0 පත්වලට .
