lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
ඇතිව/2,3,8,20,33,42,51,59,80,82,83,102,103,113,121,126,140,165,203,207,208,209,211,220,230,263,264,280,299,341,362,402,662,705,917,1141,1142,1147,1152,1501,1785,3024,4696,4887
ඉදිකර/549,2658
කොන/3,4,5,6,17,18,28,42,108,215,472,615,1138,1295,1404,2166,2171,2950,4453,4473
ගල්/14,26,29,30,35,52,277,871,1206,1281,1407,1723,1727,1730,1735,1912,1960,1977,2109,2401,2605,2740,2781,2802,3506,4105
ගැසු/98,387,1260,1676,2750,3022
ජාතික/170,372,380,501,526,795,954,1050,1221,2021,2584,3259,3695
දිව/1,5,20,22,42,59,60,83,92,102,113,114,140,167,169,179,230,262,288,290,301,325,411,456,477,495,615,700,711,821,1077,1148,1530,1535,1761,1799,1820,1874,2300,2586,2593,3214,3215,3696,3725,4212,4313
දුර/1,3,4,9,17,18,22,23,24,28,31,69,93,99,109,116,127,134,207,248,308,489,517,601,692,768,961,1097,1180,1325,1327,1518,1774,1811,1920,2259,2391,2552,2945,2946,3088,3224,3380,4161,4259,4546,4547,4910
දේව/16,18,20,27,42,51,56,73,97,104,137,157,168,169,197,205,320,333,376,432,729,777,808,847,944,947,1025,1043,1171,1248,1358,1365,1366,1786,1890,1893,1923,1924,1926,2004,2013,2372,2376,2534,2542,3258,3261,3377,3963
නාට්‍ය/2,4,13,15,19,21,26,27,29,60,166,234,359,499,781,816,994,996,1190,3306
නායක/1,27,47,62,74,81,92,97,136,141,146,154,164,195,200,249,291,322,335,356,369,424,428,449,501,527,731,1075,1077,1218,1221,1222,2036,2585,3701,3984
නියම/2,5,10,13,19,27,35,177,218,247,262,302,376,933,1040,1318,1551,2326,2397,2586,4548,4789
නිල/2,5,13,21,27,43,65,186,229,510,578,819,891,1003,1025,1608,1780,2042,2223,2503,2659,2722,2810,2867,3911,3914,4258,4743,4909
නොගන්න/3,20,35,138,1194
පැතුම/2860
පැමිණ/3,51,64,88,102,127,131,143,179,203,230,270,294,301,310,326,422,478,492,495,519,543,587,926,928,973,1022,1023,1146,1335,1645,1798,1802,1851,1852,2034,2238,2300,2301,2302,2306,2310,3113,3137,3142,3160,4697
පිවිස/3,16,51,102,121,140,179,211,216,220,224,230,263,280,286,287,310,326,402,492,649,1022,1328,1330,1798,1802,2236,2278,2282,2306,2310,2317,3077,3137,4865,4890
පෙළඹ/16,42,59,64,76,88,102,113,121,126,143,145,203,208,211,218,220,230,263,270,272,273,280,326,374,492,1018,1323,1328,2238,2283
ප්‍ර/20,22,42,51,144,167,206,260,328,420,430,592,683,788,840,1231,1438,1731,1780,1792,2399,2438,2494,2614,2701,2806,3314,3762,3918,3936,4089,4588
බාල/5,8,16,17,24,27,47,62,81,92,97,333,335,625,706,780,935,1375,1437,1571,1908,2110,2207,2336,2337,2339,2918,3185,3294,4462
මදුරු/124,242,355,388,2454,2524
මුල/1,3,4,5,6,8,18,20,22,24,25,85,99,110,122,128,147,152,243,254,255,325,584,616,756,857,910,936,1002,1139,1348,1365,1366,1570,1761,2184,2223,2879,2880,2927,3376,4301,4335,4399,4496,4543,4548,4557,4568
මූල/2,13,15,17,27,325,589,936,1033,1173,1248,1352,1761,1872,2226,2702,2703,3190,3197,3200,3201,3802,4335
රණවිරු/35,124,283,1060,1195,3556
රිය/1,3,4,7,9,11,12,17,22,23,28,31,79,116,174,214,243,271,1302,1561,2969,3237,3800,3930
වැය/4,7,36,52,83,86,87,102,121,172,177,207,217,253,457,532,612,1950
ව්‍යාපාර/2,13,15,17,19,21,26,29,38,43,63,66,70,123,128,185,186,226,250,368,390,479,734,796,1032,1033,1166,1349,1350,1868,1869,1870,1871,2344,2345,3170,3195,3196,3197,3585
සංවිධායක/18,27,62,74,81,92,97,154,249,335
සංස්ථා/2637,2644
සමාගම/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,11,12,17,19,22,23,28,31,32,99,108,110,152,214,228,229,693,2179,2797
සහෝදර/27,47,51,62,74,81,92,132,136,146,167,290,291,338,557,773,2311,2312,2587
සාක්ෂි/6,13,15,19,30,46,166,260,690,995,2884,4349
සිට/2,8,11,33,35,39,42,63,76,78,206,262,264,517,623,657,916,1152,1507,1509,2258,2262,2463,3036,3045,3860,4775,4946
සිනා/37,54,171,1045,1576,1578,1932,1935,2320,2418,2419,2420,3404
සිහි/2,9,15,19,52,56,86,156,168,172,196,219,274,298,398,565,609,612,737,900,1095,1246,1415,1677,1931,2785,2794,2832,3389,4082
සුව/2,7,11,13,19,21,46,53,64,70,127,137,139,219,274,343,365,435,457,564,978,979,1088,2113,2774,3933,5000
හාල්/30,1085
හිමි/2,9,10,21,27,36,47,52,62,64,74,76,81,86,87,88,97,100,131,132,141,143,145,146,156,161,164,166,177,189,218,232,236,239,247,294,309,322,330,392,415,422,445,446,458,465,507,509,536,554,644,733,993,996,1047,1055,1114,1221,1222,1309,1382,1455,1459,1463,2456,2464,2465,3455,4130
හුග/420
